incubator/apertium-hi-ur.hi.dix
    <pardef n="त्/ऊ__प्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊ</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊने</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उझे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उझको</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उझसे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उझमें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उझपर</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उमने </l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उमको</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उमसे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उममें</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उमपर</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एरी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारा</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारे</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उम्हारी</l>
          <r>ऊ<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="तू"><i>त्</i><par n="त्/ऊ__प्"/></e>
